Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2095.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
New Section 1. (a) Any pump installation contractor licensed under
this act shall keep a careful and accurate record of each pump installed and
shall furnish a record of the pump installation to the secretary within 30
days after installation of each pump in such form as the secretary may
require. The record shall include the following information:
(1) The name and address of the landowner and the location and legal
description of the well, including the latitude and longitude of the well;
(2) the intended use of the well water;
(3) pump information, including the date that the pump was installed,
the type of pump installed, horsepower, voltage, pump capacity in gallons

HB 2095—Am. by HC 2
per minute and the drop pipe diameter and length; and
(4) any other data as the secretary reasonably requires.
(b) This section shall be a part of and supplemental to the Kansas
groundwater exploration and protection act.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 82a-1202 is hereby amended to read as follows: 82a-
1202. (a) It is the purpose of this act to provide for the exploration and
protection of groundwater through the licensing and regulation of water
well contractors and pump installation contractors in Kansas to protect the
health and general welfare of the citizens of this state;, to protect
groundwater resources from waste and potential pollution by requiring
proper description of the location, drilling and well construction, and
proper plugging of abandoned water wells and test holes; and to provide
data on potential water supplies through well logs, well pumping tests and
water quality tests which that will permit the economic and efficient
utilization and management of the water resources of this state.
(b) In order to achieve these objectives, this act:
(1) Requires licensing of water well contractors and pump
installation contractors;
(2) provides for the establishment of standards for well construction,
reconstruction, treatment and plugging;
(3) provides for the establishment of standards for pump installation
and repair;
(4) requires each licensed water well contractor to:
(A) Keep and transmit to the state secretary, upon request, a copy of
the log of the well, pump test data, if available, and water quality samples;
and maintains
(B) maintain within the state geological survey of Kansas a record
system of well logs and water quality data which that will be made
available to the public; and
(5) requires each licensed pump installation contractor to keep and
transmit to the secretary a pump information report.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 82a-1203 is hereby amended to read as follows: 82a-
1203. As used in this act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Construction of water wells" means all acts necessary to
obtaining groundwater by any method for any use including, without
limitation, the location of and excavation for the well.
(b) "Domestic uses" means the use of water by any person, family
unit or household for household purposes, the watering of livestock,
poultry, farm and domestic animals used in operating a farm or the
irrigation of lands not exceeding a total of two acres in area for the
growing of gardens, orchards or lawns.
(c) (1) "Licensed pump installation contractor" and "Pump
installation contractor" mean means any person who has obtained a

HB 2095—Am. by HC 3
license from the department to install, repair or maintain installs, repairs
or maintains well pumps, pitless well adapters or units and pumping
equipment at the water well location, including all wiring and all
construction or repair involved in making entrance to the water well that
involves breaking the sanitary well seal.
(2) "Licensed pump installation contractor" and "Pump installation
contractor" do does not include:
(A) A person while in the act of installing a pump on land that is
owned by such person and is used by such person for domestic uses at
such person's place of abode, but only when the pump is installed in
compliance with prescribed minimum installation standards as provided in
this act; or
(B) a person who installs a pump for a licensed pump installation
contractor at such contractor's direction and under such contractor's
supervision.
(d) (1) "Licensed water well contractor" and "Water well contractor"
mean means any person who has obtained a license from the department
to construct, reconstruct, plug or treat constructs, reconstructs, plugs or
treats a water well.
(2) "Licensed water well contractor" and "Water well contractor" do
does not include:
(A) A person while in the act of constructing, reconstructing,
plugging or treating a water well on land that is owned by such person
and is used by such person for domestic uses at such person's place of
abode, but only when the well is constructed, reconstructed, plugged or
treated in compliance with prescribed minimum well standards as
provided in this act; or
(B) a person who performs labor or services for a licensed water well
contractor at such contractor's direction and under such contractor's
supervision.
(e) "Person" means any individual, association, firm, partnership,
corporation or governmental entity.
(c)(f) "Sand point" or "well point" means any driven well which that
is 25 feet or less in depth and is constructed by manually driving into the
ground a drive point fitted to the lower end of tightly connected sections of
pipe that are 2 inches or less in diameter.
(d) "Domestic uses" means the use of water by any person, family
unit or household for household purposes, the watering of livestock,
poultry, farm and domestic animals used in operating a farm or the
irrigation of lands not exceeding a total of two acres in area for the
growing of gardens, orchards or lawns.
(e)(g) "Secretary" means the secretary of health and environment.
(f)(h) "Water well" means any excavation that is drilled, cored, bored,

HB 2095—Am. by HC 4
washed, driven, dug, jetted or otherwise constructed, when the intended
use of such excavation is for the location, diversion, artificial recharge or
acquisition of groundwater.
(g) "Water well contractor" or "contractor" means any person who
constructs, reconstructs or treats a water well. The term shall not include:
(1) An individual while in the act of constructing a water well on land
which is owned by such individual and is used by such individual for
domestic purposes at such individual's place of abode, but only when the
well is constructed in compliance with prescribed minimum well standards
as provided in this act; or
(2) an individual who performs labor or services for a licensed water
well contractor at such contractor's direction and under such contractor's
supervision.
Sec. 4. K.S.A. 82a-1205 is hereby amended to read as follows: 82a-
1205. (a) The secretary shall be responsible for the administration and
enforcement of the provisions of this act and any rules and regulations
adopted pursuant thereto.
(b) (1) (A) The secretary shall fix by rules and regulations adopt rules
and regulations on a biennial basis to establish reasonable license fees
annually for each water well contractor and for each drill rig operated by
or for such water well contractor. The secretary shall fix by adopt rules and
regulations to establish an additional fee for each water well drilled except
as provided in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (c) of K.S.A. 82a-
1203(d)(2), and amendments thereto. Such fees shall be in an amount,
which, together with any other funds available therefor, will produce an
amount, which will properly administer the provisions of this act.
(B) The secretary shall adopt rules and regulations on a biennial
basis to establish reasonable license fees for pump installation
contractors. The pump installation contractor license fee shall not apply
to a person as specified in K.S.A. 82a-1203(c)(2), and amendments
thereto.
(C) Any nonresident may secure a water well contractor's license in
Kansas upon approval of an application therefor by the secretary and the
payment of a fee equal to the fee charged for a similar nonresident license
by the state in which the applicant is a resident, but in no case shall the fee
be less than that charged to a Kansas resident.
(2) The fees established pursuant to this subsection shall be in an
amount that, when taken together with any other available funds, will
allow for the proper administration of this act.
(c) The secretary shall have the power and authority and may cause to
be inspected water wells to inspect any water well, pump installation and
associated maintenance activities in all phases of construction,
reconstruction, treatment or plugging, and shall have access to such wells

HB 2095—Am. by HC 5
at all reasonable times. The secretary shall have general supervision and
authority over the construction, reconstruction and, treatment and
plugging of all water wells and the plugging of holes drilled and
abandoned in search of a groundwater supply or hydrogeological
information.
(d) The secretary may employ within funds available such
engineering, geological, legal, clerical and other personnel as may be
necessary for the proper performance of responsibilities under this act.
Such employees shall be within the classified service under the Kansas
civil service act.
(e) The secretary is authorized and directed to cause:
(1) Administer the examination to be made of applicants for licensing
of water well contractor license applicants and pump installation
contractor license applicants pursuant to K.S.A. 82a-1207, and
amendments thereto; to
(2) renew such licenses; to
(3) adopt rules and regulations necessary to establish continuing
educational requirements for persons licensed under this act; to
(4) issue licenses to qualified water well contractors and qualified
pump installation contractors in this state; to
(5) deny, modify, revoke or suspend licenses after their issuance is
hereafter determined, after notice to the person affected and an opportunity
for hearing any license issued pursuant to this act after providing notice
and an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with the provisions of the
Kansas administrative procedure act; and to
(6) issue or reinstate licenses previously denied, modified, revoked or
suspended when justification therefor for such action is shown.
(f) The secretary shall prepare, in the form and manner prescribed by
law, a report on the administration of this act.
Sec. 5. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 82a-1206 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 82a-1206. (a) Every well contractor person desiring to engage in
the business of constructing, reconstructing or treating water wells a
licensed water well contractor in this state shall make initial application
for a water well contractor license to the secretary. Every contractor Each
person making such application shall set out such information as may be
required upon forms to be adopted and furnished provided by the secretary.
The secretary shall charge an application fee as established by rules and
regulations for the filing of such initial application by a contractor, and.
The secretary shall not act upon any application until such application fee
has been paid.
(b) All application fees and license fees collected hereunder shall be
remitted to the state treasurer in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A.
75-4215, and amendments thereto. Upon receipt of each such remittance,

HB 2095—Am. by HC 6
the state treasurer shall deposit the entire amount in the state treasury to
the credit of the water program management fund established pursuant to
K.S.A. 65-166b, and amendments thereto.Each person desiring to engage
in the business of a licensed pump installation contractor in this state shall
make initial application for a pump installation contractor license to the
secretary. Each person making such application shall set out such
information as may be required upon forms provided by the secretary. The
secretary shall charge an application fee as established by rules and
regulations for the filing of such initial application. The secretary shall not
act upon any application until such application fee has been paid.
(c) A water well contractor license or a pump installation contractor
license to construct water wells shall be issued to any applicant if, under
the standards set forth in K.S.A. 82a-1207, and amendments thereto, the
secretary shall determine determines that such applicant is qualified to
conduct water well construction operations be a licensed water well
contractor or a licensed pump installation contractor. In the granting of
such licenses, due regard shall be given to the interest of the state of
Kansas in the protection of its underground water resources. Application
fees paid hereunder shall be retained by the secretary whether such initial
license is issued or denied, but if denied, the license fee shall be refunded.
(d) Applicants for licenses hereunder who are engaged in business as
a water well contractors contractor or a pump installation contractor in
this state, if incorporated required to be registered and in good standing
with the secretary of state, shall submit evidence of current good standing
with the registration requirements for corporations of the secretary of state.
(e) The fees collected by the secretary under this section shall be
remitted by the secretary to the state treasurer in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto. Upon receipt of
each such remittance, the state treasurer shall deposit the entire amount in
the state treasury to the credit of the water program fund.
Sec. 6. K.S.A. 82a-1207 is hereby amended to read as follows: 82a-
1207. (a) Under such reasonable rules and regulations as the secretary may
adopt pertaining to the business of a water well contracting and
construction of water wells contractor or pump installation contractor, the
secretary shall investigate, by examination or otherwise, the qualifications
of all applicants for an initial licenses as water well contractors to
construct, reconstruct or treat wells for production of underground waters
license as a water well contractor or pump installation contractor in this
state. Where an examination is required, such examination may be oral or,
written, online or both any combination thereof.
(1) The qualifications required of each candidate for such an a water
well contractor examination are as follows:
(a)(A) Familiarity with Kansas water laws, sanitary standards for

HB 2095—Am. by HC 7
water well drilling and construction of water wells and rules and
regulations relating to water well construction, reconstruction, treatment
and plugging as adopted by the secretary;
(b)(B) knowledge of groundwater and subsurface geology in its
relation to well construction;
(C) knowledge of current drilling methods, including, but not limited
to, cable-tool, hollow-stem auger, mud-rotary, direct-push, sonic, air
rotary and sand bailing;
(D) familiarity with:
(i) Pump installation, replacement and repair for water wells,
including any necessary components of the water well system; and
(ii) installation of water treatment devices, water pressure tanks,
pressure switches, pressure relief valves and pitless well adapters or units
for water wells; and
(E) a minimum of two years of experience working under a licensed
water well contractor.
(2) The qualifications required of each candidate for a pump
installation contractor examination are as follows:
(A) Familiarity with Kansas water laws and rules and regulations
that relate to water well construction, reconstruction and treatment as
adopted by the secretary;
(B) familiarity with:
(i) Pump installation, replacement for and repair of water wells,
including any necessary components of the water well system; and
(ii) installation of water treatment devices, water pressure tanks,
pressure switches, pressure relief valves and pitless well adapters or units
for water wells; and
(C) a minimum of one year of experience working under a licensed
pump installation contractor.
(b) The examinations conducted by the secretary shall be held at such
times and places as he the secretary may determine. Failure of an applicant
to pass such examination shall disqualify him the applicant from making
further application for a period of one (1) month. The secretary shall act
within a reasonable time upon all applications for licenses hereunder in
this section.
Sec. 7. K.S.A. 82a-1209 is hereby amended to read as follows: 82a-
1209. (a) The term of all licenses issued under the provisions of this act
shall be for two years beginning on July 1 of each even-numbered year
through the following June 30 of the following even-numbered year.
(b) Any water well contractor or pump installation contractor
licensed under the provisions of this act may, on or before July 1, of each
even-numbered year, renew such license by paying the annual fee as
determined by the secretary and complying with continuing education

HB 2095—Am. by HC 8
requirements established by the secretary.
(c) (1) If the licensee has not met the requirements for renewal of the
license on or before July 1 of each even-numbered year, the license shall
be revoked by the secretary.
(2) Prior to such revocation, however, the secretary shall notify the
applicant of the secretary's intention to revoke the applicant's license at
least 10 days prior to the time set for action to be taken, by notice to the
applicant at the address appearing on such license in the records and files
of the secretary and compliance with the provisions of the Kansas
administrative procedure act.
(d) A license, once revoked, may not be reinstated unless the
revocation resulted because of an error of the secretary or other reason not
the fault of the licensee.
(e) (1) A person whose water well contractor or pump installation
contractor license has been revoked and who desires to continue to engage
in the business of water well construction become relicensed in this state,
must make shall submit an application as provided for in K.S.A. 82a-1207
pursuant to K.S.A. 82a-1206, and amendments thereto.
(2) Such applicant may be required to retake the examination
pursuant to K.S.A. 82a-1206, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 8. K.S.A. 82a-1210 is hereby amended to read as follows: 82a-
1210. (a) Any license issued under this act may be revoked by the
secretary:
(1) When the licensee has practiced fraud or deceit in obtaining a
license or otherwise while engaging in activities regulated by this act;
(2) for negligence or incompetence; or
(3) for violating any requirement of this act; or
(4) when a licensee voluntarily relinquishes a license.
(b) (1) Any person, in addition to the secretary, may make complaint
against any licensee.
(2) Notice shall be given to the licensee of the specific charges, made
in any such complaint in accordance with the notice provisions of the
Kansas administrative procedure act.
(c) Prior to revocation or suspension of a license, the water well
contractor or pump installation contractor shall be afforded the
opportunity promptly to bring the well up to standard or to correct the
error resulting in the complaint. Compliance must be acceptable to the
secretary.
(d) The secretary shall not revoke any license pursuant to this section
without giving the licensee an opportunity for hearing in accordance with
the provisions of the Kansas administrative procedure act.
Sec. 9. K.S.A. 82a-1212 is hereby amended to read as follows: 82a-
1212. (a) Any Every water well contractor licensed under this act who

HB 2095—Am. by HC 9
constructs, reconstructs or plugs a water well shall keep a careful and
accurate log record of the construction, reconstruction or plugging of such
well each water well that such contractor constructs, reconstructs or plugs
and shall furnish a submit each record of said well log to the secretary
within thirty (30) days after of the completion of such constructing,
reconstructing or plugging such water well in such form as the secretary
might may require. The log record shall show include the following
information:
(a)(1) The name and address of the landowner and the location and
the legal description of the location of the well, including the latitude and
longitude of the well;
(b) The character and depth of the formation passed through or
encountered(2) the description and depth of any encountered geological
materials;
(c)(3) the depth at which water is encountered, if possible;
(d)(4) the depth and diameter of the borehole;
(5) if a gravel pack is used, the type of material, size of particles and
depth of such gravel pack;
(6) the depth and thickness of grout or other sealing material, if
applicable;
(7) blank casing information, including the length, outside diameter,
wall thickness and type of material of such blank casing, if applicable;
(8) screen information, including the length, outside diameter, slot or
perforation size and type, wall thickness and type of material of such
screen, if applicable;
(9) the casing joint or connection type, if applicable;
(10) the static water level of the completed well, if applicable;
(e) A copy of the record of pumping tests, if any; and(11) the water
level reached when pumped at the designated rate, including the rate of
pumping and amount of time pumped, if applicable;
(f) The construction or reconstruction details of the completed water
well including lengths and sizes of casing, length and size of perforations
or screens, and length and size of gravel packing;
(g) The amount, type and placement of plug materials used in
plugging a water well.
A water sample shall be furnished to the secretary, upon request, within
thirty (30) days after completion of such well unless an extension of time
is granted by the secretary, in which case, the sample shall be furnished to
the secretary within such extended period of time. The well logs and a
copy of the water quality analysis shall be transmitted by the secretary to
the state geological survey and kept on file by the survey and be available
to the public.
(12) the yield of the water well in gallons per minute or gallons per

HB 2095—Am. by HC 10
hour, if applicable;
(13) information on any pump installed if applicable, including the
date that the pump was installed, the type of pump, horsepower, voltage,
pump capacity in gallons per minute, and the drop or column pipe
diameter and length;
(14) the intended use of the well water;
(15) certification that the well was disinfected, if applicable;
(16) identification of any permit required for the water well,
including any state, county or municipal permit;
(17) the name and signature of the licensed water well contractor
and license number or the name and phone number of the individual as
specified in K.S.A. 82a-1203(h)(1), and amendments thereto;
(18) the date that the construction, reconstruction or plugging, as
applicable, was completed; and
(19) any other data that the secretary reasonably requires.
(b) A water quality analysis of any well shall be provided to the
secretary, upon request, within 60 days after completion of each well
unless an extension of time is granted by the secretary. If an extension of
time is so granted, the water quality analysis shall be provided to the
secretary within such extended period of time. A Kansas-certified
laboratory shall conduct the water quality analysis.
(c) The secretary shall transmit each well record and a copy of the
water quality analysis to the state geological survey to be kept on file. The
state geological survey shall make each such transmitted record and
analysis publicly available.
Sec. 10. K.S.A. 82a-1213 is hereby amended to read as follows: 82a-
1213. (a) All holes drilled in search of a water supply and abandoned, shall
be properly plugged by the drilling water well contractor in accordance
with rules and regulations established by the secretary in order to assure
ensure adequate and proper plugging of abandoned wells to prevent
pollution of existing groundwater.
(b) Any water well contractor who fails to properly seal any
exploratory wells drilled in search of a water supply and abandoned by
him or her the water well contractor shall be subject to the penalties set
out in this act.
(c) All unplugged abandoned water wells shall be plugged or caused
to be plugged by the landowner in accordance with rules and regulations
established by the secretary in order to assure ensure adequate and proper
plugging of abandoned water wells to prevent pollution to existing
groundwater supplies, except that no .
(d) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, an
unplugged abandoned water well existing on the effective date of this act
which is not polluting or threatening to pollute a groundwater supply or

HB 2095—Am. by HC 11
before July 1, 1973, that does not pose a threat to public health, safety or
the environment shall not be required to be plugged.
Sec. 11. K.S.A. 82a-1214 is hereby amended to read as follows: 82a-
1214. Any person who shall willfully violate any lawful rule or regulation
of the secretary relating to water well contracting, or who shall engage in
the business of constructing, reconstructing or treating water wells without
first having obtained a license as in this act required, or who shall
knowingly violate any provisions of this act, shall be guilty of a class B
misdemeanor and subject to the penalties therefor as provided by law. In
addition the secretary of health and environment is hereby authorized to
apply to the district court for enforcement of this act or rules and
regulations adopted under this act in accordance with the provisions of the
Kansas judicial review act. Any person who knowingly violates any
provisions of this act or any rules and regulations adopted under this act,
or who engages in the business of a water well contractor or a pump
installation contractor without first obtaining a license as required by this
act, shall be guilty of a class B nonperson misdemeanor and subject to the
penalties therefor as provided by law. The secretary is hereby authorized
to apply to the district court for enforcement of this act or rules and
regulations adopted under this act in accordance with the provisions of the
Kansas judicial review act.
Sec. 12. K.S.A. 82a-1216 is hereby amended to read as follows: 82a-
1216. (a) Any person who violates any provision of the Kansas
groundwater exploration and protection act, any rules and regulations
adopted thereunder or any order issued by the secretary thereunder shall
incur, in addition to other penalties provided by law, a civil penalty of not
to exceed $5,000 for each violation. In the case of a continuing violation,
every day that such violation continues shall be deemed a separate
violation.
(b) (1) The secretary of the department of health and environment or
the director of the division of environment, if designated by the secretary,
upon a finding that a person has violated any provision of the Kansas
groundwater exploration and protection act, or any order issued or any rule
and regulation adopted thereunder, may:
(1) (A) Issue a written order requiring that necessary remedial or
preventive action be taken within a reasonable time period;
(2) (B) assess a civil penalty for each violation within the limits
provided in this section, which shall constitute an actual and substantial
economic deterrent to the violation for which assessed; or
(3) (C) both issue such order and assess such penalty.
(2) The order shall specify the provisions of the act or rules and
regulations alleged to be violated and the facts constituting each violation.
Such order shall include the right to a hearing. Any such order shall

HB 2095—Am. by HC 12
become final unless, within 15 days after service of the order, the person
named therein shall request in writing a hearing by the secretary. If a
hearing is requested, the secretary shall notify the alleged violator or
violators of the date, place and time of the hearing.
(c) No civil penalty shall be imposed under this section except after
notification by issuance and service of the written order and hearing, if a
hearing is requested, in accordance with the provisions of the Kansas
administrative procedure act.
(d) Any person aggrieved by an order of the secretary made under
this section may appeal such order to the district court in the manner
provided by the Kansas judicial review act.
(e) Any penalty recovered pursuant to the provisions of this section
shall be remitted to the state treasurer in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto. Upon receipt of each such
remittance, the state treasurer shall deposit the entire amount in the state
treasury to the credit of the state general water program fund.
(f) Nothing in this act shall be construed to abridge, limit or otherwise
impair the right of any person to damages or other relief on account of
injury to persons or property and to maintain any action or other
appropriate proceeding therefor.
Sec. 13. K.S.A. 82a-1202, 82a-1203, 82a-1205, 82a-1207, 82a-1209,
82a-1210, 82a-1212, 82a-1213, 82a-1214, 82a-1216 and 82a-1218 and
K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 82a-1206 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 14. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.